Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 74 O.S. 2021, Section 5060.26, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5060.26. A. A private, not-for-profit corporation may
be organized pursuant to the provisions of Title 18 of the Oklahoma
Statutes and the provisions of this act to develop the Industrial
Extension System in Oklahoma, with a special emphasis on minority
business enterprises. Such corporation, upon certification by
Oklahoma Futures, shall be known as and may exercise all of the
powers of OAME.
B. In addition to the provisions and requirements of Title 18
of the Oklahoma Statutes, the certificate of incorporation and the
bylaws of OAME must be certified by Oklahoma Futures and the
certificate of incorporation shall:
1. Designate the name of the corporation as the Oklahoma
Alliance for Manufacturing Excellence, Inc.;
2. Provide that the exclusive purposes of OAME are public
purposes to assist small and medium-sized manufacturing firms, with

a special emphasis on minority business enterprises, to gain the
ability, through education, technology transfer, and otherwise, to
compete successfully at progressively higher levels of value-added
in the national and international economy;
3. Provide for the following three classes of membership in
OAME which shall have representation on the Board of Directors of
OAME:
a. one class composed of small and medium-sized
manufacturing firms located in Oklahoma, and the
certificate of incorporation shall provide for the
qualifications for membership in such class,
b. one class composed of large corporations, and the
certificate of incorporation shall provide for the
qualifications for membership in such class, and
c. one class composed of state entities, including, but
not limited to, the Oklahoma Center for the
Advancement of Science and Technology, the Oklahoma
Department of Commerce, the Oklahoma Department of
Career and Technology Education, and the Oklahoma
State Regents for Higher Education;
4. Provide for classes of associate membership which shall not
have representation on the Board of Directors of OAME, except as
provided in paragraph 5 of this subsection;
5. Provide that the Board of Directors of OAME shall consist of
five nine representatives of members who shall be individuals
elected at the first annual meeting of OAME by members of the class
composed of small and medium-sized manufacturing firms, and four
representatives of members who shall be individuals elected at the
first annual meeting of OAME by members of the class composed of
large corporations. The Board of Directors also shall include the
President following state governmental representatives as ex officio
members: the Executive Director of the Oklahoma Center for the
Advancement of Science and Technology, the Executive Director of a
designee from the Oklahoma Department of Commerce, the Director of
and a designee from the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology
Education and the Chancellor of Higher Education as ex officio
members (CareerTech). The bylaws of OAME may provide for designees
who may serve in the place of any of the directors and the terms
under which any such designation will be made. The Board of
ENR. H. B. NO. 1376 Page 2

Directors shall have the power to elect, from time to time, persons
to serve as directors who are associate members or are not
affiliated with any entity or firm which qualifies for membership in
OAME, provided that no more than three (3) of one such persons
person shall serve on the Board of Directors at any time;
6. Have the authority to set membership dues in an amount to be
determined by the Board of Directors. No participating state entity
shall pay membership dues;
7. Provide for all powers necessary or appropriate to carry out
and effectuate its corporate purposes, including, but not limited
to, the following:
a. to maintain an office at such place or places as it
may designate,
b. to make and execute contracts with any individual,
corporation, association or any other entity and all
other instruments necessary or convenient for the
performance of its duties and the exercise of its
powers and functions under this act,
c. to receive funds from any source to carry out the
purposes of this act, including, but not limited to,
gifts or grants from any department, agency or
instrumentality of the United States or of the state
for any purpose consistent with the provisions of this
act,
d. to acquire or sell, convey, lease, exchange, transfer
or otherwise dispose of its property or any interest
therein,
e. to develop plans and policies to assist small and
medium-sized manufacturing companies in Oklahoma,
f. to enter into contracts to provide assistance to small
and medium-sized manufacturing companies, including,
but not limited to, the following categories:
(1) technology,
(2) human resources development,
ENR. H. B. NO. 1376 Page 3

(3) market planning,
(4) finance, and
(5) inter-firm collaboration,
g. to assist other organizations providing general
business assistance to small and medium-sized
manufacturing enterprises,
h. to establish manufacturing quality and standards
certification programs, setting minimum standards and
issuing certification to companies meeting such
standards,
i. to develop and distribute information about
manufacturing modernization and assistance that is
available to support efforts to improve the abilities
of small and medium-sized firms to produce and market
higher value-added products,
j. to establish a system to evaluate the effectiveness
and efficiency of services provided to small and
medium-sized manufacturing firms,
k. to establish and operate, directly or under contract,
an information system designed to access resources
that will assist the firms to become more productive,
l. establish a training program for individuals working
on behalf of small and medium-sized manufacturing
firms, and
m. to establish special educational and informational
programs for its members.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1376 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 25th day of February,
2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1376 Page 5